Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,111
Notice and action on amendment of articles of organization or bylaws.

To amend its articles of organization or bylaws:

(1) A proposed amendment shall be approved by a majority vote of the board of directors unless a greater vote is required by the articles of organization or bylaws; and

(2) The board of directors shall mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

(a) The proposed amendment;

(b) A recommendation that the members approve the amendment unless the board determines because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation;

(c) If the board makes no recommendation, the basis of that decision;

(d) Any condition of its submission of the amendment to the members; and

(e) Notice of the meeting in the same manner as a special members' meeting.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 111.